District of Columbia statutes.
50-1331.06

Titling Rebuilt Salvage Vehicles.

(a)

The Department shall issue a Rebuilt Salvage Title if the owner has been issued a Salvage Title and passed inspection.

(b)

Ownership of a Rebuilt Salvage Vehicle shall be transferred only through the use of a Rebuilt Salvage Title.

History

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 106, 52 DCR 1700